src/num-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON Attributes2_PL
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>де Clitics ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь Clitics ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def:%>тне%>нень Clitics ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с Clitics ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тне%>ва kudo-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тне%>втеме kudo-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тне%>кс Clitics ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>сэ kudo-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>стэ kudo-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl+CompCx+Def:%>тне%>шка kudo-Tenses1 ;






LEXICON Tenses1
+Pred+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н Clitics ;
+Pred+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т Clitics ;
+Pred+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но Clitics ;
+Pred+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до Clitics ;

+NoVowX+Pred+Prt2+ScSg1:%>линь Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+Prt2+ScSg2:%>лить Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+Prt2+ScSg3:%>ль Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+Prt2+ScPl1@P.KLOSS.ON@:%>линек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+Prt2+ScPl2:%>лиде Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+Prt2+ScPl3:%>льть Clitics ;
+Pred+NonPast+ScPl1@R.TLOSS.ON:%>А2но@R.TLOSS.ON@ Clitics ;
+Pred+NonPast+ScPl2@R.TLOSS.ON:%>А2до@R.TLOSS.ON@ Clitics ;

+VowX+Pred+Prt2+ScSg1:%>О1линь Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+Prt2+ScSg2:%>О1лить Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+Prt2+ScSg3:%>О1ль Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+Prt2+ScPl1@P.KLOSS.ON@:%>О1линек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+Prt2+ScPl2:%>О1лиде Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+Prt2+ScPl3:%>О1льть Clitics ;

LEXICON Clitics
+Use/Sub@R.KLOSS.ON@:%>ак@R.KLOSS.ON@ # ;
+Foc/Гак:%>Г1ак # ;
   # ; ! No clitics

LEXICON vese-QNT
+Pron: kudo-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
+Pron: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
+Adn: # ;
